Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2313
Preceptorship, defined.

Preceptorship means the clinical practice component of an educational program for the preparation of nurse practitioners.

Laws 1981, LB 379, § 11;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 17;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 35;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 51;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1714;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 805.